Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1987 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1987, 1991, 1995, 2008, 2014, and 2016 to make other minor word changes.

Administrative Code. —

For environmental conservation, see 18 AAC.

Collateral references. —

Frank P. Grad, Treatise on Environmental Law (Matthew Bender).

Michael B. Gerard, Environmental Law Practice Guide: State and Federal Law (Matthew Bender).

Cooke and Davis, The Law of Hazardous Waste: Management, Cleanup, Liability, and Litigation (Matthew Bender).

Mitchell H. Lathrop, Insurance Coverage for Environmental Claims (Matthew Bender).

Berz and Spracker, Environmental Law in Real Estate and Business Transactions (Matthew Bender).